Washington statutes.
RCW 2.08.060

Judges—Election.

There shall be in each of the counties a superior court. Judges of the superior court shall be elected at the general election in November, 1952, and every four years thereafter.

[ 1951 c 125 s 2; 1949 c 237 ss 1-5, part; 1945 c 20 s 1, part; 1933 ex.s. c 63 ss 1-3, part; 1927 c 135 s 1, part; Rem. Supp. 1949 ss 11045-1f-1i, part; Rem. Supp. 1945 ss 11045-1d & 1e, part; RRS ss 11045-1, 1a, 1b, 1c, part. Prior: 1925 ex.s. c 66 ss 1-3, part; 1925 ex.s. c 132 ss 1-4, part; 1917 c 97 ss 1-5, part; 1913 c 17 ss 1-4, part; 1911 c 40 ss 1-3, part; 1911 c 62 ss 1-3, part; 1911 c 76 ss 1-3, part; 1911 c 129 ss 1-3, part; 1911 c 131 ss 1-2, part; 1909 c 10 ss 1-3, part; 1909 c 12 ss 1-3, part; 1909 c 52 ss 1-3, part; 1909 c 94 ss 1-3, part; 1907 c 79 ss 1-3, part; 1907 c 106 s 1, part; 1907 c 178 ss 1-2, part; 1905 c 9 ss 1-3, part; 1905 c 36 ss 1-4, part; 1903 c 50 s 1, part; 1895 c 89 s 1, part; 1891 c 68 ss 1-3, part; 1890 p 341 s 1, part.]

NOTES:

Election, terms, etc., superior judges: State Constitution Art. 4 s 5.

Eligibility of judges: State Constitution Art. 4 s 17.

Impeachment: State Constitution Art. 5.

Judges ineligible to other office: State Constitution Art. 4 s 15.

Judges may not practice law: State Constitution Art. 4 s 19.

Removal from office: State Constitution Art. 4 s 9.